Utah statutes.
39-6-40.   Offenses against the state by person not subject to chapter.

A person not subject to this chapter is guilty of an offense against the state if he willfully neglects or refuses to appear, refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify, or refuses to produce any evidence which that person may have been legally subpoenaed to produce, after he has been:

(1)  subpoenaed to appear as a witness or to produce books and records before a military court or before any military or civil officer designated to take a deposition to be read in evidence before the court; and

(2)  paid or tendered the fees and mileage of a witness at the rates allowed to witnesses attending the district courts of the state.



Amended by Chapter 9, 1988 Special Session 2

